North Carolina, session 2025, SB205.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. SWIMMING POOL AMENDMENTS
SECTION 1. G.S. 130A-39(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A local board of health may adopt a more stringent rule in an area regulated by the
Commission for Public Health or the Environmental Management Commission where, in the
opinion of the local board of health, a more stringent rule is required to protect the public health;
otherwise, the rules of the Commission for Public Health or the rules of the Environmental
Management Commission shall prevail over local board of health rules. However, a local board
of health may not adopt a rule concerning a private pool serving a single family dwelling
otherwise exempt from regulation pursuant to G.S. 130A-280 or a rule concerning the grading,
operating, and permitting of food and lodging facilities as listed in Part 6 of Article 8 of this
Chapter and as defined in G.S. 130A-247(1), and a local board of health may adopt rules
concerning wastewater collection, treatment and disposal systems which are not designed to
discharge effluent to the land surface or surface waters only in accordance with
G.S. 130A-335(c)."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-280, as amended by Section 4.51 of S.L. 2024-49, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 130A-280. Scope.Scope and definitions.
(a) This Article Part provides for the regulation of public swimming pools in the State as
they may affect the public health and safety. As used in this Article, the term "public swimming
pool" means any structure, chamber, or tank containing an artificial body of water used by the
public for swimming, diving, wading, recreation, or therapy, together with buildings,
appurtenances, and equipment used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether
a fee is charged for its use. The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel, apartment,
boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools and spas, spas operating for
display at temporary events, and artificial swimming lagoons. As used in this Article, an
*S205-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"artificial swimming lagoon" means any body of water used for recreational purposes with more
than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial liner, and a method of disinfectant that results
in a disinfectant residual in the swimming zone that is protective of the public health. This Article
Part does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A private pool serving a single family dwelling and used only by the residents
of the dwelling and their guests.guests, regardless of whether their guests gain
use of the private pool through a sharing economy platform or pay a fee for
its use. In all cases in which a fee is exchanged for access to a private pool
serving a single family dwelling that is used only by the residents of the
dwelling and their guests, the private pool shall be maintained in good and
safe working order.
(2) A private pool serving a single family dwelling meeting the minimum
requirements of this subdivision which is offered to, and used by, individuals
on a temporary basis utilizing a sharing economy platform. For the purposes
of this subdivision, a sharing economy platform means an online platform
used to facilitate peer-to-peer transactions to acquire, provide, or share access
to goods and services. For the purposes of this subdivision, a pool must meet
all of the following minimum requirements:
a. Pools must have proper fencing and barriers to prevent unsupervised
access, especially by children. The fence should be at least 4 feet high
with a self-latching gate.
b. Pools must have clear and conspicuous signage posted around the pool
area specifying pool rules, depth markers, and any potential hazards.
c. Pools must be equipped with basic lifesaving equipment, including life
rings and reaching poles.
d. Pool decks and surrounding areas must have non-slip surfaces.
e. Pools must have properly fitted covers for all submerged suction
outlets.
f. Pools must be well-maintained with proper chemical balance and
cleanliness to ensure safe and healthy swimming conditions.
(3) Therapeutic pools used in physical therapy programs operated by medical
facilities licensed by the Department or operated by a licensed physical
therapist, nor to therapeutic chambers drained, cleaned, and refilled after each
individual use.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Artificial swimming lagoon. – Any body of water used for recreational
purposes with more than 20,000 square feet of surface area, an artificial liner,
and a method of disinfectant that results in a disinfectant residual in the
swimming zone that is protective of the public health.
(2) Public swimming pool. – Any structure, chamber, or tank containing an
artificial body of water used by the public for swimming, diving, wading,
recreation, or therapy, together with buildings, appurtenances, and equipment
used in connection with the body of water, regardless of whether a fee is
charged for its use. The term includes municipal, school, hotel, motel,
apartment, boarding house, athletic club, or other membership facility pools
and spas, spas operating for display at temporary events, and artificial
swimming lagoons.
(3) Sharing economy platform. – An online platform used to facilitate
peer-to-peer transactions to acquire, provide, or share access to goods and
services."

Page 2 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART II. LOCAL GOVERNMENT DEVELOPMENT REGULATION REFORM

LIMIT PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT REGULATION AUTHORITY TO THAT
EXPRESSLY GRANTED BY CHAPTER 160D OF THE GENERAL STATUTES
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 160D-101 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-101. Application.
(a) The provisions of this Article shall apply to all development regulations and programs
adopted pursuant to this Chapter or applicable or related local acts. To the extent there are
contrary provisions in local charters or acts, G.S. 160D-111 is applicable unless this Chapter
expressly provides otherwise. The provisions of this Article also apply to any other local
ordinance that substantially affects land use and development.
(b) The provisions of this Article are supplemental to specific provisions included in
other Articles of this Chapter. To the extent there are conflicts between the provisions of this
Article and the provisions of other Articles of this Chapter, the more specific provisions shall
control.
(c) Local governments may also apply any of the definitions and procedures authorized
by this Chapter to any ordinance that does not substantially affect land use and development
adopted under the general police power of cities and counties, Article 8 of Chapter 160A of the
General Statutes and Article 6 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes respectively, and may
employ any organizational structure, board, commission, or staffing arrangement authorized by
this Chapter to any or all aspects of those ordinances.
(d) This Chapter does not expand, diminish, or alter the scope of authority for planning
and development regulation authorized by other Chapters of the General Statutes.
(e) Except as provided by local act, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local
government may not exercise development regulation authority except as expressly authorized
by this Chapter. If State law governs a particular subject matter related to local government
development regulation authority, a local government shall not enact or enforce development
regulations more restrictive than those established by State law, unless the development
regulation pertains to floodplain management regulations as described in G.S. 143-138(e)."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 160D-110(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) G.S. 153A-4 and G.S. 160A-4 are not applicable to this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 160D-111 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-111. Effect on prior laws.
(a) The enactment of this Chapter does not require the readoption of any local
government ordinance enacted pursuant to laws that were in effect before January 1, 2020 and
are restated or revised herein. The provisions of this Chapter do not affect any act heretofore
done, any liability incurred, any right accrued or vested, or any suit or prosecution begun or cause
of action accrued as of January 1, 2020. October 1, 2025. The enactment of this Chapter does not
amend the geographic area within which local government development regulations adopted
prior to January 1, 2020, are effective.
(b) G.S. 153A-3 and G.S. 160A-3 are applicable to this Chapter. Nothing in this Chapter
repeals or amends a charter or local act in effect as of June 19, 2020, October 1, 2025, unless this
Chapter or a subsequent enactment of the General Assembly clearly shows a legislative intent to
repeal or supersede that charter or local act.act, or if that charter or local act is inconsistent with
the provisions of this Chapter.
…."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 153A-121 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) This section does not apply to the adoption or enforcement of development
regulations under Chapter 160D of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.(e) G.S. 160A-174 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(c) This section does not apply to the adoption or enforcement of development
regulations under Chapter 160D of the General Statutes."

LIMIT ZONING REGULATION AUTHORITY
SECTION 4. G.S. 160D-702 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-702. Grant of power.
(a) A local government may adopt zoning regulations. Except as provided in subsections
(b) and (c) of this section, a zoning regulation may regulate and restrict the height, number of
stories, and size of buildings and other structures; the percentage of lots that may be occupied;
the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces; the density of population; the location and use
of buildings, structures, and land. A local government may regulate development, including
floating homes, over estuarine waters and over lands covered by navigable waters owned by the
State pursuant to G.S. 146-12. A zoning regulation shall provide density credits or severable
development rights for dedicated rights-of-way pursuant to G.S. 136-66.10 or G.S. 136-66.11.
Where appropriate, a zoning regulation may include requirements that street and utility
rights-of-way be dedicated to the public, that provision be made of recreational space and
facilities, and that performance guarantees be provided, all to the same extent and with the same
limitations as provided for in G.S. 160D-804 and G.S. 160D-804.1.
(b) Any regulation relating to building design elements adopted under this Chapter may
not be applied to any structures subject to regulation under the North Carolina Residential Code
except under one or more of the following circumstances:
(1) The structures are located in an area designated as a local historic district
pursuant to Part 4 of Article 9 of this Chapter.
(2) The structures are located in an area designated as a historic district on the
National Register of Historic Places.
(3) The structures are individually designated as local, State, or national historic
landmarks.
(4) The regulations are directly and substantially related to the requirements of
applicable safety codes adopted under G.S. 143-138.
(5) Where the regulations are applied to manufactured housing in a manner
consistent with G.S. 160D-908 and federal law.
(6) Where the regulations are adopted as a condition of participation in the
National Flood Insurance Program.
Regulations prohibited by this subsection may not be applied, directly or indirectly, in any
zoning district or conditional district unless voluntarily consented to by the owners of all the
property to which those regulations may be applied as part of and in the course of the process of
seeking and obtaining a zoning amendment or a zoning, subdivision, or development approval,
district, nor may any such regulations be applied indirectly as part of a review pursuant to
G.S. 160D-604 or G.S. 160D-605 of any proposed zoning amendment for consistency with an
adopted comprehensive plan or other applicable officially adopted plan.
For the purposes of this subsection, the phrase "building design elements" means exterior
building color; type or style of exterior cladding material; style or materials of roof structures or
porches; exterior nonstructural architectural ornamentation; location or architectural styling of
windows and doors, including garage doors; the number and types of rooms; and the interior
layout of rooms. The phrase "building design elements" does not include any of the following:
(i) the height, bulk, orientation, or location of a structure on a zoning lot, (ii) the use of buffering
or screening to minimize visual impacts, to mitigate the impacts of light and noise, or to protect
the privacy of neighbors, or (iii) regulations adopted pursuant to this Article governing the
permitted uses of land or structures subject to the North Carolina Residential Code.
Nothing in this subsection affects the validity or enforceability of private covenants or other
contractual agreements among property owners relating to building design elements.
Page 4 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) A zoning or other development regulation shall not do any of the following:
(1) Set a minimum width, length, or square footage of any structures subject to
regulation under the North Carolina Residential Code.
(2) Require a or otherwise specify the size, configuration, allocation, or number
of parking space spaces to be larger than 9 feet wide by 20 feet long unless
the parking space is designated for handicap, parallel, or diagonal
parking.greater than those required by the Americans with Disabilities Act.
(3) Require additional fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or
two-family dwellings that are not in compliance with the required number of
fire apparatus access roads into developments of one- or two-family dwellings
set forth in the North Carolina Fire Code of the North Carolina Residential
Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings.Code.
(4) Except as provided under G.S. 160A-307, set a minimum width, length, or
square footage for driveways within a development unless the driveway abuts
a public road. This subdivision shall not be construed to expand, diminish, or
alter the Department of Transportation's authority to regulate driveways
adjacent to public roads owned by the State.
(5) Except as provided in this subdivision, set design standards for public roads
within a development in excess of those required by the Department of
Transportation. A city may set design standards for public roads within a
development in excess of those required by the Department of Transportation
if the city is financially responsible for the cost of the excess and accepts
ownership and maintenance responsibility for the public road prior to, or in
conjunction with, site plan approval. Confirmation of conformity of the
improvements consistent with the city's design standards under this subsection
shall be conducted consistent with G.S. 160D-804.1(1c). Upon confirmation
that the improvements have been made consistent with G.S. 160D-804.1(1c),
the city shall record with the register of deeds a plat evidencing the city's
ownership of the public road.
(d) In exercising its authority under this section, a local government shall support its
determinations by demonstrating there is a rational and substantial relationship between the
zoning map, zoning regulations, or zoning amendment and (i) the local government's
comprehensive plan and (ii) the public health, safety, and welfare, through findings of facts and
information, other than mere personal preferences or speculation, that a reasonable person would
accept in support of a conclusion.
(e) For purposes of this section, the term "public road" shall mean any road, street,
highway, thoroughfare, or other way of passage that is owned and maintained by a city or the
Department of Transportation."

LIMIT CURB CUT REGULATIONS
SECTION 5. G.S. 160A-307 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-307. Curb cut regulations.
(a) A Except as expressly permitted by Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, a city may
not regulate by ordinance regulate the size, location, direction of traffic flow, and manner of
construction of driveway connections into any street or alley. The To the extent allowed by
Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, the ordinance may require the construction or
reimbursement of the cost of construction and public dedication of medians, acceleration and
deceleration lanes, and traffic storage lanes for driveway connections into any street or alley if
all of the following apply:
(1) The city has shown through substantial evidence that the need for such the
improvements is reasonably attributable to the traffic using the driveway.
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The city has shown through substantial evidence that the improvements serve
the traffic of the driveway.
(b) No street or alley under the control of the Department of Transportation may be
improved without the consent of the Department of Transportation. A city shall not require the
applicant to acquire right-of-way from property not owned by the applicant. However, an
applicant may voluntarily agree to acquire such right-of-way.
(c) For purposes of this section, "substantial evidence" means facts and information,
other than mere personal preferences or speculation, that a reasonable person would accept in
support of a conclusion."

REQUIRE ZONING DISTRICTS TO BE BASED ON DENSITY AND CLARIFY
PROHIBITION ON CONDITIONS NOT AUTHORIZED BY LAW
SECTION 6. G.S. 160D-102 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-102. Definitions.
Unless otherwise specifically provided, or unless otherwise clearly required by the context,
the words and phrases defined in this section shall have the following meanings indicated when
used in this Chapter:
…
(15b) Dwelling unit. – A single unit, subject to the North Carolina Residential Code,
providing complete, independent living facilities for one or more persons,
including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and
sanitation.
…."
SECTION 7. G.S. 160D-703 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-703. Zoning districts.
(a) Types of Zoning Districts. – A Except as provided in subsection (a1) of this section,
a local government may divide its territorial jurisdiction into zoning districts of any number,
shape, and area deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of this Article. Within those districts,
it may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, or use of
buildings, structures, or land. Zoning By illustration, zoning districts may include, but are not be
limited to, include any of the following:
(1) Conventional districts, in which a variety of uses are allowed as permitted uses
or uses by right and that may also include uses permitted only with a special
use permit.
(2) Conditional districts, in which site plans or individualized development
conditions are imposed.
(3) Form-based districts, or development form controls, that address the physical
form, mass, and density of structures, public spaces, and streetscapes.
(4) Overlay districts, in which different requirements are imposed on certain
properties within one or more underlying conventional, conditional, or
form-based districts.
(5) Districts allowed by charter.
(a1) Residential Zoning Districts Classified Based on Density. – A local government shall
classify residential zoning districts based only on the number of dwelling units allowed per acre.
A local government shall not classify residential zoning districts based on the minimum lot size
allowed in the district. For purposes of determining allowable residential density, the actual gross
acreage shall not be reduced by subtracting buffers, setbacks, public or private streets, open space
or recreation areas, or other nondevelopable areas.
(b) Conditional Districts. – Property may be placed in a conditional district only in
response to a petition by all owners of the property to be included. Specific conditions may be
proposed by the petitioner or the local government or its agencies, but only those conditions
Page 6 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
approved by the local government and consented to by the petitioner in writing may be
incorporated into the zoning regulations. Unless consented to by the petitioner in writing,
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the exercise of the authority granted by this
section, a local government may not (i) require, enforce, or incorporate into the zoning
regulations any condition or requirement not authorized by otherwise applicable law, regulations
any condition, requirement, or deed restriction not specifically authorized by law, (ii) require,
enforce, or incorporate into the zoning regulations any condition or requirement that the courts
have held to be unenforceable if imposed directly by the local government, or (iii) accept any
offer by the petitioner to consent to any condition not specifically authorized by law, including,
without limitation, taxes, impact fees, building design elements within the scope of
G.S. 160D-702(b), driveway-related improvements in excess of those allowed in
G.S. 136-18(29) and G.S. 160A-307, or other unauthorized limitations on the development or
use of land. This subsection shall also apply to the approval of any site plan, development
agreement, conditional zoning permit, or any other instrument under this Chapter. Conditions
and site-specific standards imposed in a conditional district shall be limited to those that address
the conformance of the development and use of the site to local government ordinances, plans
adopted pursuant to G.S. 160D-501, or the impacts reasonably expected to be generated by the
development or use of the site. The zoning regulation may provide that defined minor
modifications in conditional district standards that do not involve a change in uses permitted or
the density of overall development permitted may be reviewed and approved administratively.
Any other modification of the conditions and standards in a conditional district shall follow the
same process for approval as are applicable to zoning map amendments. If multiple parcels of
land are subject to a conditional zoning, the owners of individual parcels may apply for
modification of the conditions so long as the modification would not result in other properties
failing to meet the terms of the conditions. Any modifications approved apply only to those
properties whose owners petition for the modification.
(b1) Limitations. – For parcels where multifamily structures are an allowable use, a local
government may not impose a harmony requirement for permit approval if the development
contains affordable housing units for families or individuals with incomes below eighty percent
(80%) of the area median income.
(c) Uniformity Within Districts. – Except as authorized by the foregoing, all zoning
regulations shall be uniform for each class or kind of building throughout each district but the
zoning regulations in one district may differ from those in other districts.
(d) Standards Applicable Regardless of District. – A zoning regulation or unified
development ordinance may also include development standards that apply uniformly
jurisdiction-wide rather than being applicable only in particular zoning districts.
(e) Staff Approvals. – Development approvals for a development that is a permitted use
in the zoning district where the development is located shall be made only by the designated staff
member as described in G.S. 160D-402.
(f) Basis for Conditional District. – In exercising its authority under subsection (b) of this
section, a local government shall support its determinations with facts and information, other
than mere personal preferences or speculation, that a reasonable person would accept in support
of a conclusion that there is a rational and substantial relationship between the conditional district
and the public health, safety, and welfare."

VESTED RIGHTS MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 160D-108 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-108. Permit choice and vested rights.
…
(c) Vested Rights. – Amendments in land development regulations are not applicable or
enforceable without the written consent of the owner with regard to any of the following:
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Buildings or uses of buildings or land for which a development permit
application has been submitted and subsequently issued in accordance with
G.S. 143-755.
(2) Subdivisions of land for which a development permit application authorizing
the subdivision has been submitted and subsequently issued in accordance
with G.S. 143-755.
(3) A site-specific vesting plan pursuant to G.S. 160D-108.1.
(4) A multi-phased development pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.
(5) A vested right established by the terms of a development agreement
authorized by Article 10 of this Chapter.
The establishment of a vested right under any subdivision of this subsection does not preclude
vesting under one or more other subdivisions of this subsection or vesting by application of
common law principles. A vested right, once established as provided for in this section or by
common law, precludes any action by a local government that would change, alter, impair,
prevent, diminish, or otherwise delay the development or use of the property allowed by the
applicable land development regulation or regulations, except where a change in State or federal
law mandating local government enforcement occurs after the development application is
submitted that has a fundamental and retroactive effect on the development or use. A vested right
obtained by permit or other local government approval shall not preclude the use or extinguish
the existence of any other vested right or use by right attached to the property.
(d) Duration of Vesting. – Upon issuance of a development permit, the statutory vesting
granted by subsection (c) of this section for a development project is effective upon filing of the
application in accordance with G.S. 143-755, for so long as the permit remains valid pursuant to
law. Unless otherwise specified by this section or other statute, local development permits expire
one year after issuance unless work authorized by the permit has substantially commenced. A
local land development regulation may provide for a longer permit expiration period. For the
purposes of this section, a permit is issued either in the ordinary course of business of the
applicable governmental agency or by the applicable governmental agency as a court directive.
Except where a longer vesting period is provided by statute or land development regulation,
the statutory vesting granted by this section, once established, expires for an uncompleted
development project if development work is intentionally and voluntarily discontinued for a
period of not less than 24 consecutive months, and the statutory vesting period granted by this
section for a nonconforming use of property expires if the use is intentionally and voluntarily
discontinued for a period of not less than 24 consecutive months. The 24-month discontinuance
period is automatically tolled during the any of the following:
(1) The pendency of any board of adjustment proceeding or civil action in a State
or federal trial or appellate court regarding the validity of a development
permit, the use of the property, or the existence of the statutory vesting period
granted by this section.
(2) The 24-month discontinuance period is also tolled during the pendency of any
litigation involving the development project or property that is the subject of
the vesting.
(3) The duration of any emergency declaration issued under G.S. 166A-19.20 or
G.S. 166A-19.22 for which the defined emergency area includes the property,
in whole or in part.
…."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 160D-108.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-108.1. Vested rights – site-specific vesting plans.
…
(c) Approval and Amendment of Plans. – If a site-specific vesting plan is based on an
approval required by a local development regulation, the local government shall provide
Page 8 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
whatever notice and hearing is required for that underlying approval. A duration of the underlying
approval that is less than two five years does not affect the duration of the site-specific vesting
plan established under this section. If the site-specific vesting plan is not based on such an
approval, an approval required by a development regulation, a legislative hearing with notice as
required by G.S. 160D-602 shall be held.
A local government may approve a site-specific vesting plan upon any terms and conditions
that may reasonably be necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. Conditional
approval results in a vested right, although failure to abide by the terms and conditions of the
approval will result in a forfeiture of vested rights. A local government shall not require a
landowner to waive the landowner's vested rights as a condition of developmental approval. A
site-specific vesting plan is deemed approved upon the effective date of the local government's
decision approving the plan or another date determined by the governing board upon approval.
An approved site-specific vesting plan and its conditions may be amended with the approval of
the owner and the local government as follows: any substantial modification must be reviewed
and approved in the same manner as the original approval; minor modifications may be approved
by staff, if such the modifications are defined and authorized by local regulation.
…
(e) Duration and Termination of Vested Right. –
(1) A vested right for a site-specific vesting plan remains vested for a period of
two five years. This vesting shall not be extended by any amendments or
modifications to a site-specific vesting plan unless expressly provided by the
local government.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, a local
government may provide for rights to be vested for a period exceeding two
five years but not exceeding five eight years where warranted in light of all
relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the size and phasing of
development, the level of investment, the need for the development, economic
cycles, and market conditions or other considerations. These determinations
are in the sound discretion of the local government and shall be made
following the process specified for the particular form of a site-specific
vesting plan involved in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(3) Upon issuance of a building permit, the provisions of G.S. 160D-1111 and
G.S. 160D-1115 apply, except that a permit does not expire and shall not be
revoked because of the running of time while a vested right under this section
is outstanding.
(4) A right vested as provided in this section terminates at the end of the
applicable vesting period with respect to buildings and uses for which no valid
building permit applications have been filed.
(f) Subsequent Changes Prohibited; Exceptions. –
(1) A vested right, once established as provided for in this section, precludes any
zoning action development regulation by a local government which would
change, alter, impair, prevent, diminish, or otherwise delay the development
or use of the property as set forth in an approved site-specific vesting plan,
except under one or more of the following conditions:
a. With the written consent of the affected landowner.
b. Upon findings, by ordinance after notice and an evidentiary hearing,
that natural or man-made hazards on or in the immediate vicinity of
the property, if uncorrected, would pose a serious threat to the public
health, safety, and welfare if the project were to proceed as
contemplated in the site-specific vesting plan.
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. To the extent that the affected landowner receives compensation for
all costs, expenses, and other losses incurred by the landowner,
including, but not limited to, all fees paid in consideration of financing,
and all architectural, planning, marketing, legal, and other consulting
fees incurred after approval by the local government, together with
interest as provided under G.S. 160D-106. Compensation shall not
include any diminution in the value of the property which is caused by
the action.
d. Upon findings, by ordinance after notice and an evidentiary hearing,
that the landowner or the landowner's representative intentionally
supplied inaccurate information or made material misrepresentations
that made a difference in the approval by the local government of the
site-specific vesting plan or the phased development plan.
e. Upon the enactment or promulgation of a State or federal law or
regulation that precludes development as contemplated in the
site-specific vesting plan or the phased development plan, in which
case the local government may modify the affected provisions, upon a
finding that the change in State or federal law has a fundamental effect
on the plan, by ordinance after notice and an evidentiary hearing.
(2) The establishment of a vested right under this section does not preclude
precludes the application of overlay zoning or other development regulations
which impose additional requirements but do not affect the allowable type or
intensity of use, or ordinances or regulations which are general in nature and
are applicable to all property subject to development regulation by a local
government, including, but not limited to, building, fire, plumbing, electrical,
and mechanical codes. Otherwise applicable new development regulations
become effective with respect to property which is subject to a site-specific
vesting plan upon the expiration or termination of the vesting rights period
provided for in this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the establishment of a vested
right does not preclude, change, or impair the authority of a local government
to adopt and enforce development regulations governing nonconforming
situations or uses.nonconformities.
…."

ESTABLISH JURISDICTION FOR LAND THAT LIES WITHIN MORE THAN ONE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT
SECTION 9. G.S. 160D-203 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-203. Split jurisdiction.
(a) If a parcel of land lies within the planning and development regulation jurisdiction of
more than one local government, for the purposes of this Chapter, the local governments may,
by mutual agreement pursuant to Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes and with
the written consent of the landowner, assign exclusive planning and development regulation
jurisdiction under this Chapter for the entire parcel to any one of those local governments. Such
a mutual agreement government, the following shall apply:
(1) If only one local government has the ability to provide water and sewer
services to the parcel at the time a site plan for the parcel is submitted, the
local government that has the ability to provide public water and sewer
services shall have planning and development regulation jurisdiction over the
entire parcel.
Page 10 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) If all of the local governments have the ability to either provide public water
services or public sewer services to the parcel, but not both, at the time a site
plan for the parcel is submitted, the landowner may designate which local
government's planning and development regulations shall apply to the land.
(3) If all or none of the local governments have the ability to provide public water
and sewer services to the parcel at the time a site plan for the parcel is
submitted, the local government where the majority of the parcel is located
shall have jurisdiction over the land.
(b) The jurisdiction established by this section shall only be applicable to development
regulations and shall not affect taxation or other nonregulatory matters. The mutual agreement
shall be evidenced by a resolution formally adopted by each governing board and recorded with
the register of deeds in the county where the property is located within 14 days of the adoption
of the last required resolution."

PERMIT CHOICE MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 10. G.S. 143-755(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Development. – Without altering the scope of any regulatory authority granted
by statute or local act, any of the following:
a. The construction, erection, alteration, enlargement, renovation,
substantial repair, movement to another site, or demolition of any
structure.
b. Excavation, grading, filling, clearing, or alteration of land.
c. The subdivision of land as defined in G.S. 160D-802.
d. The initiation of substantial change in the use of land or the intensity
of the use of land.
(2) Development permit. – An administrative administrative, legislative, or
quasi-judicial approval that is written and that is required prior to commencing
development or undertaking a specific activity, project, or development
proposal, including any of the following:
a. Zoning permits.
b. Site plan approvals.
c. Special use permits.
d. Variances.
e. Certificates of appropriateness.
f. Plat approvals.
g. Development agreements.
h. Building permits.
i. Subdivision of land.
j. State agency permits for development.
k. Driveway permits.
l. Erosion and sedimentation control permits.
m. Sign permit.
n. Conditional zoning.
(3) Land development regulation. – Any State statute, rule, or regulation, or local
ordinance affecting the development or use of real property, including any of
the following:
a. Unified development ordinance.
b. Zoning regulation, including zoning maps.
c. Subdivision regulation.
d. Erosion and sedimentation control regulation.
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. Floodplain or flood damage prevention regulation.
f. Mountain ridge protection regulation.
g. Stormwater control regulation.
h. Wireless telecommunication facility regulation.
i. Historic preservation or landmark regulation.
j. Housing code.
k. Conditional zoning."

LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO DESIGNATE APPLICABLE STAFF FOR
DEVELOPMENT DETERMINATIONS
SECTION 11. G.S. 160D-402, as amended by S.L. 2024-49, reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-402. Administrative staff.
(a) Authorization. – Local governments may appoint administrators, inspectors,
enforcement officers, planners, technicians, and other staff to develop, administer, and enforce
development regulations authorized by this Chapter. Local governments shall designate at least
one staff member charged with making determinations under that local government's
development regulations for purposes of G.S. 160D-703.
(b) Duties. – Duties assigned to staff may include, but are not limited to, drafting and
implementing plans and development regulations to be adopted pursuant to this Chapter;
determining whether applications for development approvals are complete; receiving and
processing applications for development approvals; providing notices of applications and
hearings; making decisions and determinations regarding development regulation
implementation; determining whether applications for development approvals meet applicable
standards as established by law and local ordinance; conducting inspections; issuing or denying
certificates of compliance or occupancy; enforcing development regulations, including issuing
notices of violation, orders to correct violations, and recommending bringing judicial actions
against actual or threatened violations; keeping adequate records; and any other actions that may
be required in order adequately to enforce the laws and development regulations under their
jurisdiction. A development regulation may require that designated staff members take an oath
of office. The local government shall have the authority to enact ordinances, procedures, and fee
schedules relating to the administration and the enforcement of this Chapter. The administrative
and enforcement provisions related to building permits set forth in Article 11 of this Chapter shall
be followed for those permits.
(c) Alternative Local Government Staff Arrangements. – A local government may enter
into contracts with another city, county, or combination thereof under which the parties agree to
create a joint staff for the enforcement of State and local laws specified in the agreement. The
governing boards of the contracting parties may make any necessary appropriations for this
purpose.
In lieu of joint staff, a governing board may designate staff from any other city or county to
serve as a member of its staff with the approval of the governing board of the other city or county.
A staff member, if designated from another city or county under this section, subsection, shall,
while exercising the duties of the position, be considered an agent of the local government
exercising those duties. The governing board of one local government may request the governing
board of a second local government to direct one or more of the second local government's staff
members to exercise their powers within part or all of the first local government's jurisdiction,
and they shall thereupon be empowered to do so until the first local government officially
withdraws its request in the manner provided in G.S. 160D-202.
The contract or designation of staff under this subsection shall specify at least one individual
designated as charged with making determinations under each local government's development
regulations for purposes of G.S. 160D-703.
Page 12 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c1) Alternative Contract Staff Arrangements. – A local government may contract with an
individual, company, council of governments, regional planning agency, metropolitan planning
organization, or rural planning agency to designate an individual who is not a city or county
employee to work under the supervision of the local government to exercise the functions
authorized by this section. The local government shall have the same potential liability, if any,
for inspections conducted by an individual who is not an employee of the local government as it
does for an individual who is an employee of the local government. The company or individual
with whom the local government contracts shall have errors and omissions and other insurance
coverage acceptable to the local government. The contract shall require at least one individual
designated as charged with making determinations under that local government's development
regulations for purposes of G.S. 160D-703.
(d) Financial Support. – The local government may appropriate for the support of the
staff any funds that it deems necessary. It shall have power to fix reasonable fees for support,
administration, and implementation of programs authorized by this Chapter. Chapter, and those
fees shall not exceed the actual, direct, and reasonable costs required to support, administer, and
implement programs authorized by this Chapter. All fees collected by a building inspection
department for the administration and enforcement of provisions set forth in Article 11 of this
Chapter shall be used to support the administration and operations of the building inspection
department and for no other purposes. When an inspection, for which the permit holder has paid
a fee to the local government, is performed by a marketplace pool Code-enforcement official
upon request of the State Fire Marshal under G.S. 143-151.12(9)a., the local government shall
promptly return to the permit holder the fee collected by the local government for such inspection.
This subsection applies to the following types of inspection: plumbing, electrical systems,
general building restrictions and regulations, heating and air-conditioning, and the general
construction of buildings."

REVIEW PERIODS ESTABLISHED FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT APPROVALS AND
DECISIONS
SECTION 12.(a) G.S. 160D-403, as amended by S.L. 2024-49, reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-403. Administrative development approvals and determinations.
(a) Development Approvals. – To the extent consistent with the scope of regulatory
development regulation authority granted by this Chapter, no person shall commence or proceed
with development without first securing any required development approval from the local
government with jurisdiction over the site of the development. A development approval shall be
in writing and may contain a provision requiring the development to comply with all applicable
State and local laws. A local government may issue development approvals in print or electronic
form. Any development approval issued exclusively in electronic form shall be protected from
further editing once issued. Applications for development approvals may be made by the
landowner, a lessee or person holding an option or contract to purchase or lease land, or an
authorized agent of the landowner. An easement holder may also apply for development approval
for such the development as is authorized by the easement.
(a1) Time Period for Approval. – Within seven calendar days of the filing of an application
for a development approval, a local government or its designated administrative staff, as
described under G.S. 160D-402, shall (i) determine whether the application is complete and
notify the applicant of the application's completeness and, (ii) if the local government or its
designated administrative staff determines the application is incomplete, specify all of the
deficiencies in the notice to the applicant. The applicant may file an amended application or
supplemental information to cure the deficiencies identified by the local government or its
designated administrative staff for a completeness review, which shall be completed within seven
calendar days after receiving an amended application or supplemental application from the
applicant. Upon the date the application is deemed complete, the local government or its
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
designated administrative staff shall issue a receipt letter or electronic response stating that the
application is complete. From the date an application has been determined to be complete, the
local government or its designated administrative staff shall have 20 days to perform an initial
review of the completed application and notify the applicant of any required changes, to which
an applicant shall have 15 days to respond. If the applicant makes changes in response to
comments arising from the initial review, the local government or its designated administrative
staff shall have 10 calendar days to review any changes submitted by the applicant. Upon
expiration of that 10-day secondary review period, a final 90-calendar day review period shall
begin. The local government shall approve or deny the application within 90 calendar days of the
date the 10-day secondary review period expires, except that if the applicant requests a
continuance of the application, the review period shall be tolled for the duration of any
continuance. The time period for review may be extended only by agreement with the applicant
if the application cannot be reviewed within the specified time limitation due to circumstances
beyond the control of the local government. The extension shall not exceed six months. Failure
of the local government or its designated administrative staff to act before the expiration of the
time period allowed for review shall constitute an approval of the application, and the local
government shall issue a written approval upon demand by the applicant.
…."
SECTION 12.(b) Article 7 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-707. Review period for rezoning decisions.
Within seven calendar days of the filing of an application for amendment of a zoning map or
zoning regulations, a local government or its designated administrative staff, as described under
G.S. 160D-402, shall (i) determine whether the application is complete and notify the applicant
of the application's completeness and, (ii) if the local government or its designated administrative
staff determines the application is incomplete, specify all of the deficiencies in the notice to the
applicant. The applicant may file an amended application or supplemental information to cure
the deficiencies identified by the local government or its designated administrative staff for a
completeness review, which shall be completed within seven calendar days after receiving an
amended application or supplemental application from the applicant. Upon the date the
application is deemed complete, the local government or its designated administrative staff shall
issue a receipt letter or electronic response stating that the application is complete. From the date
an application has been determined to be complete, the local government or its designated
administrative staff shall have 20 days to perform an initial review of the completed application
and notify the applicant of any required changes, to which an applicant shall have 15 days to
respond. If the applicant makes changes in response to comments arising from the initial review,
the local government or its designated administrative staff shall have 10 calendar days to review
any changes submitted by the applicant. Upon expiration of that 10-day secondary review period,
a final 90-calendar day review period shall begin. The local government shall approve or deny
the application within 90 calendar days of the date the 10-day secondary review period expires,
except that if the applicant requests a continuance of the application, the review period shall be
tolled for the duration of any continuance. The time period for review may be extended only by
agreement with the applicant if the application cannot be reviewed within the specified time
limitation due to circumstances beyond the control of the local government. The extension shall
not exceed six months. Failure of the local government or its designated administrative staff to
act before the expiration of the time period allowed for review shall constitute an approval of the
application, and the local government shall issue a written approval upon demand by the
applicant."

PROHIBIT WAITING PERIODS FOR REFILING OF DEVELOPMENT
APPLICATIONS
Page 14 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 13. G.S. 160D-601 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(e) Withdrawn or Denied Applications. – A development regulation or unified
development ordinance may not include waiting periods prohibiting a landowner, developer, or
applicant from refiling a denied or withdrawn application for a zoning map amendment, text
amendment, development application, or request for development approval."

ADMINISTRATIVE SUBDIVISION REGULATIONS/APPROVALS/APPEALS
SECTION 14.(a) G.S. 160D-803 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-803. Review process, filing, and recording of subdivision plats.
(a) Any subdivision regulation adopted pursuant to this Article shall contain provisions
setting forth the procedures and standards to be followed in granting or denying approval of a
subdivision plat prior to its registration.
(b) A subdivision regulation shall provide that the following agencies be given an
opportunity to make recommendations concerning an individual subdivision plat before the plat
is approved:
(1) The district highway engineer as to proposed State streets, State highways,
and related drainage systems.
(2) The county health director or local public utility, as appropriate, as to
proposed water or sewerage systems.
(3) Any other agency or official designated by the governing board.
(c) The subdivision regulation may shall provide that final decisions on preliminary plats
and final plats are administrative and to be made by any of the following:
(1) The governing board.
(2) The governing board on recommendation of a designated body.
(3) A designated planning board, technical review committee of local government
staff members, or other designated body or staff person.
If the final decision on a subdivision plat is administrative, the decision may be assigned to a
staff person or committee comprised entirely of staff persons, and notice of the decision shall be
as provided by G.S. 160D-403(b). If the final decision on a subdivision plat is quasi-judicial, the
decision shall be assigned to the governing board, the planning board, the board of adjustment,
or other board appointed pursuant to this Chapter, and the procedures set forth in G.S. 160D-406
shall apply.
(d) After the effective date that a subdivision regulation is adopted, no subdivision within
a local government's planning and development regulation jurisdiction shall be filed or recorded
until it shall have been submitted to and approved by the governing board or appropriate body, a
staff person or committee comprised entirely of staff persons, as specified in the subdivision
regulation, and until this approval shall have been entered on the face of the plat in writing by an
authorized representative of the local government. Within 10 days after approving a preliminary
or final plat, an authorized representative of the local government shall enter the approval on the
face of the preliminary or final plat. The review officer, pursuant to G.S. 47-30.2, shall not certify
a subdivision plat that has not been approved in accordance with these provisions nor shall the
clerk of superior court order or direct the recording of a plat if the recording would be in conflict
with this section.
(e) Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-403(c), once approval has been entered on the face of the
plat in accordance with this section, the approval shall be valid and not expire unless the
landowner applies for, and receives, a subsequent development approval."
SECTION 14.(b) G.S. 160D-804 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-804. Contents and requirements of regulation.
…
(d) Recreation Areas and Open Space. – The regulation may provide for the dedication
or reservation of recreation areas serving residents of the immediate neighborhood within the
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subdivision or, alternatively, for payment of funds to be used to acquire or develop recreation
areas serving residents of the development or subdivision or more than one subdivision or
development within the immediate area. All funds received by cities a local government pursuant
to this subsection shall be used only for the acquisition or development of recreation, park, or
open space sites. All funds received by counties pursuant to this subsection shall be used only
for the acquisition of recreation, park, or open space sites. Any formula enacted to determine the
amount of funds that are to be provided under this subsection shall be based on the value of the
development or subdivision for property tax purposes. The regulation may allow a combination
or partial payment of funds and partial dedication of land when the governing board determines
that this combination is in the best interests of the citizens of the area to be served.
…."
SECTION 14.(c) G.S. 160D-1403 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-1403. Appeals of decisions on subdivision plats.
(a) When a subdivision regulation adopted under this Chapter provides that the decision
whether to approve or deny a preliminary or final subdivision plat is quasi-judicial, then that
decision of the board is subject to review by the superior court by a proceeding in the nature of
certiorari. G.S. 160D-406 and this section apply to those appeals.
(b) When a subdivision regulation adopted under this Chapter provides that the decision
whether to approve or deny a preliminary or final subdivision plat is administrative, or for For
any other administrative decision implementing a subdivision regulation, the following applies:
(1) If made by the governing board or planning board, the decision is subject to
review by filing an action in superior court seeking appropriate declaratory or
equitable relief within 30 days from receipt of the written notice of the
decision, which shall be made as provided in G.S. 160D-403(b).
(2) If made by the staff or a staff committee, the decision is subject to appeal as
provided in G.S. 160D-405.
(c) For purposes of this section, a subdivision regulation is deemed to authorize a
quasi-judicial decision if the decision-making entity under G.S. 160D-803(c) is authorized to
decide whether to approve or deny the plat based not only upon whether the application complies
with the specific requirements set forth in the regulation but also on whether the application
complies with one or more generally stated standards requiring a discretionary decision to be
made."

EXPAND CAUSES FOR CIVIL ACTION INVOLVING CLAIMS INVOLVING
QUESTIONS OF INTERPRETATION AND CLARIFY STANDING IN SUCH CASES
SECTION 15. G.S. 160D-1403.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-1403.1. Civil action for declaratory relief, injunctive relief, other remedies; joinder
of complaint and petition for writ of certiorari in certain cases.
(a) Civil Action. – Except as otherwise provided in this section for claims involving
questions of interpretation, in lieu of any remedies available under G.S. 160D-405 or
G.S. 160D-108(h), a person with standing, as defined in subsection (b) of this section, may bring
an original civil action seeking declaratory relief, injunctive relief, damages, or any other
remedies provided by law or equity, in superior court or federal court to challenge the
enforceability, validity, or effect of a local land development regulation or development approval
or denial for any of the following claims:
(1) The ordinance, development regulation, either on its face or as applied, is
unconstitutional.
(2) The ordinance, development regulation, either on its face or as applied, is ultra
vires, preempted, arbitrary or capricious, or is otherwise in excess of statutory
authority.
Page 16 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The ordinance, development regulation, either on its face or as applied,
constitutes a taking of property.
(4) The development approval or denial is ultra vires, preempted, in excess of its
statutory authority, made upon unlawful procedure, made in error of law,
arbitrary and capricious, or an abuse of discretion.
(a1) Appeals of Administrative Decisions. – If the decision development approval being
challenged under subsection (a) of this section is from an administrative official charged with
enforcement of a local land development regulation, the party with standing must first bring any
claim that the ordinance development regulation was erroneously interpreted to the applicable
board of adjustment pursuant to G.S. 160D-405. An adverse ruling from the board of adjustment
may then be challenged in an action brought pursuant to this subsection with the court hearing
the matter de novo together with any of the claims listed in this subsection.
(b) Standing. – Any of the following criteria provide standing to bring an action under
this section:
(1) The person has an ownership, leasehold, or easement interest in, or possesses
an option or contract to purchase the property that is the subject matter of a
final and binding decision made by an administrative official charged with
applying or enforcing a land development regulation.
(2) The person was a development permit applicant before the decision-making
board whose decision is being challenged.
(3) The person was a development permit applicant who is aggrieved by a final
and binding decision of an administrative official charged with applying or
enforcing a land development regulation.
(4) An association, organization, society, or entity whose membership is
comprised of an individual or entity identified in subdivision (2) or (3) of this
subsection.
…
(g) Definitions. – The definitions definition of "development permit" in G.S. 143-755
shall apply in this section."

EXPAND PRIVATE REMEDIES FOR VIOLATIONS OF CHAPTER 160D OF THE
GENERAL STATUTES
SECTION 16. Article 14 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-1403.3. Private remedies.
In addition to any other remedy otherwise provided by law, any person with standing under
subdivision (2), (3), or (4) of G.S. 160D-1403.1(b) may bring a civil action to enforce the
provisions of this Chapter and recover damages, costs, and disbursements, including costs of
investigation and reasonable attorneys' fees, and receive other equitable relief as determined by
the court."
SECTION 17. G.S. 6-21.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 6-21.7. Attorneys' fees; cities or counties acting outside the scope of their authority.
(a) In any action in which a city or county is a party, upon a finding by the court that the
city or county violated a statute or case law setting forth unambiguous limits on its authority, the
court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the party who successfully challenged
the city's or county's action. In any action in which a city or county is found to be liable under
G.S. 160D-1403.1, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the party who
successfully challenged the acts of the city or county under G.S. 160D-1403.1.
(b) In any action in which a city or county is a party, upon finding by the court that the
city or county took action inconsistent with, or in violation of, G.S. 160D-108(b) or
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 143-755, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the party who
successfully challenged the local government's failure to comply with any of those provisions.
(c) In all other matters, matters not covered by subsection (a) or (b) of this section, the
court may award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing private litigant.
(d) For purposes of this section, "unambiguous" means that the limits of authority are not
reasonably susceptible to multiple constructions."

PLAN CONSISTENCY SUBJECT TO JUDICIAL REVIEW
SECTION 18. G.S. 160D-605(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Plan Consistency. – When adopting or rejecting any zoning text or map amendment,
the governing board shall approve a brief statement describing whether its action is consistent or
inconsistent with an adopted comprehensive or land-use plan. The requirement for a plan
consistency statement may also be met by a clear indication in the minutes of the governing board
that at the time of action on the amendment the governing board was aware of and considered
the planning board's recommendations and any relevant portions of an adopted comprehensive
or land-use plan. If a zoning map amendment is adopted and the action was deemed inconsistent
with the adopted plan, the zoning amendment has the effect of also amending any future land-use
map in the approved plan, and no additional request or application for a plan amendment is
required. A plan amendment and a zoning amendment may be considered concurrently. The plan
consistency statement is not subject to judicial review. If a zoning map amendment qualifies as
a "large-scale rezoning" under G.S. 160D-602(b), the governing board statement describing plan
consistency may address the overall rezoning and describe how the analysis and policies in the
relevant adopted plans were considered in the action taken."

REQUIRE ANNUAL PUBLICATION OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT FINANCIAL
REPORTS ON FEES ASSOCIATED WITH BUILDING CODE ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 19. G.S. 160D-1102(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) No later than October 1 of 2023, 2024, and 2025, each year, every local government
shall publish an annual financial report on how it used fees from the prior fiscal year for the
support, administration, and implementation of its building code enforcement program as
required by G.S. 160D-402(d). This report is in addition to any other financial report required by
law."

REQUIRE THE DIVISION OF HIGHWAYS TO ACCEPT PERFORMANCE
GUARANTEES PENDING COMPLETION OF SUBDIVISION STREETS
SECTION 20. G.S. 136-102.6 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the Division of Highways
shall accept a performance guarantee as provided under G.S. 160D-804.1 to ensure completion
of streets that are required by a development regulation under Chapter 160D of the General
Statutes. On receipt of the performance guarantee, the Division of Highways shall issue a
certificate of approval to the municipality or county as to those streets."

PART III. SEVERABILITY/EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 21. If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the
provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 22. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective October 1,
2025, and applies to applications, approvals, and actions filed on or after that date. Any local
government ordinance in effect on, or adopted subsequent to, October 1, 2025, that is inconsistent
Page 18 Senate Bill 205-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
with this act is void and unenforceable. Unless expressly stated otherwise, the provisions of this
act do not affect any right accrued or vested prior to its enactment.
Senate Bill 205-Third Edition Page 19